North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 22. Urban Redevelopment Law.
§ 160A-512.
Powers of commission.

A commission shall constitute a public body, corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental powers, which powers shall include all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Article, including the following powers in addition to those herein otherwise granted:

To procure from the planning commission the designation of areas in need of redevelopment and its recommendation for such redevelopment;

To cooperate with any government or municipality as herein defined;

To act as agent of the State or federal government or any of its instrumentalities or agencies for the public purposes set out in this Article;

To prepare or cause to be prepared and recommend redevelopment plans to the governing body of the municipality and to undertake and carry out “redevelopment projects” within its area of operation;

Subject to the provisions of G.S. 160A-514(b) to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair, by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities for or in connection with a redevelopment project; and (notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Article or any other provision of law), to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of a redevelopment project, and to include in any contract let in connection with such a project, provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate;

Within its area of operation, to purchase, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, devise, eminent domain or otherwise, any real or personal property or any interest therein, together with any improvements thereon, necessary or incidental to a redevelopment project, except that eminent domain may only be used to take a blighted parcel; to hold, improve, clear or prepare for redevelopment any such property, and subject to the provisions of

G.S. 160A-514

, and with the approval of the local governing body sell, exchange, transfer, assign, subdivide, retain for its own use, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein, either as an entirety to a single “redeveloper” or in parts to several redevelopers; provided that the commission finds that the sale or other transfer of any such part will not be prejudicial to the sale of other parts of the redevelopment area, nor in any other way prejudicial to the realization of the redevelopment plan approved by the governing body; to enter into contracts, either before or after the real property that is the subject of the contract is acquired by the Commission (although disposition of the property is still subject to

G.S. 160A-514

), with “redevelopers” of property containing covenants, restrictions, and conditions regarding the use of such property for residential, commercial, industrial, recreational purposes or for public purposes in accordance with the redevelopment plan and such other covenants, restrictions and conditions as the commission may deem necessary to prevent a recurrence of blighted areas or to effectuate the purposes of this Article; to make any of the covenants, restrictions or conditions of the foregoing contracts covenants running with the land, and to provide appropriate remedies for any breach of any such covenants or conditions, including the right to terminate such contracts and any interest in the property created pursuant thereto; to borrow money and issue bonds therefor and provide security for bonds; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the commission against any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance; and to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Article;

To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any funds not required for immediate disbursements, in such investments as may be lawful for guardians, executors, administrators or other fiduciaries under the laws of this State; to redeem its bonds at the redemption price established therein or to purchase its bonds at less than redemption price, all bonds so redeemed or purchased to be cancelled;

To borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans evidenced by bonds, grants, contributions and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the State, county, municipality or other public body or from any sources, public or private for the purposes of this Article, to give such security as may be required and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith; and, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, may include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for a redevelopment project such conditions imposed pursuant to federal law as the commission may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this Article;

Acting through one or more commissioners or other persons designated by the commission, to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information; to administer oaths, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers;

Within its area of operation, to make or have made all surveys, studies and plans (but not including the preparation of a general plan for the community) necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this Article and in connection therewith to enter into or upon any land, building, or improvement thereon for such purposes and to make soundings, test borings, surveys, appraisals and other preliminary studies and investigations necessary to carry out its powers but such entry shall constitute no cause of action for trespass in favor of the owner of such land, building, or improvement except for injuries resulting from negligence, wantonness or malice; and to contract or cooperate with any and all persons or agencies public or private, in the making and carrying out of such surveys, appraisals, studies and plans.A redevelopment commission is hereby specifically authorized to make (i) plans for carrying out a program of voluntary repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements and (ii) plans for the enforcement of laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements. The redevelopment commission is further authorized to develop, test and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and elimination of slums and urban blight.

To make such expenditures as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article; and to make expenditures from funds obtained from the federal government;

To sue and be sued;

To adopt a seal;

To have perpetual succession;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the commission; and any contract or instrument when signed by the chairman or vice-chairman and secretary or assistant secretary, or, treasurer or assistant treasurer of the commission shall be held to have been properly executed for and on its behalf;

To make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules, regulations and resolutions;

To make available to the government or municipality or any appropriate agency, board or commission, the recommendations of the commission affecting any area in its field of operation or property therein, which it may deem likely to promote the public health, morals, safety or welfare;

To perform redevelopment project undertakings and activities in one or more contiguous or noncontiguous redevelopment areas which are planned and carried out on the basis of annual increments.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 9; 1961, c. 837, ss. 5, 7; 1969, c. 254, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1276, s. 14; 2003-403, s. 17; 2006-224, s. 2.3; 2006-259, s. 47; 2011-284, s. 120.

§ 160A-513.
Preparation and adoption of redevelopment plans.

A commission shall prepare a redevelopment plan for any area certified by the planning commission to be a redevelopment area. A redevelopment plan shall be sufficiently complete to indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements and the proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment project area.

The planning commission’s certification of a redevelopment area shall be made in conformance with its comprehensive general plan, if any (which may include, inter alia, a plan of major traffic arteries and terminals and a land use plan and projected population densities) for the area.

A commission shall not acquire real property for a development project unless the governing body of the community in which the redevelopment project area is located has approved the redevelopment plan, as hereinafter prescribed; provided, however, that the commission may acquire, through negotiation, specific pieces of property in the redevelopment area prior to the approval of such plan when the governing body finds that advance acquisition of such properties is in the public interest and specifically approves such action.

The redevelopment commission’s redevelopment plan shall include, without being limited to, the following:

The boundaries of the area, with a map showing the existing uses of the real property therein;

A land use plan of the area showing proposed uses following redevelopment;

Standards of population densities, land coverage and building intensities in the proposed redevelopment;

A preliminary site plan of the area;

A statement of the proposed changes, if any, in zoning ordinances or maps;

A statement of any proposed changes in street layouts or street levels;

A statement of the estimated cost and method of financing redevelopment under the plan; provided, that where redevelopment activities are performed on the basis of annual increments, such statement to be sufficient shall set forth a schedule of the activities proposed to be undertaken during the incremental period, together with a statement of the estimated cost and method of financing such scheduled activities only;

A statement of such continuing controls as may be deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Article;

A statement of a feasible method proposed for the relocation of the families displaced.

The commission shall hold a public hearing prior to its final determination of the redevelopment plan. Notice of such hearing shall be given once a week for two successive calendar weeks in a newspaper published in the municipality, or if there be no newspaper published in the municipality, by posting such notice at four public places in the municipality, said notice to be published the first time or posted not less than 15 days prior to the date fixed for said hearing.

The commission shall submit the redevelopment plan to the planning commission for review. The planning commission, shall, within 45 days, certify to the redevelopment commission its recommendation on the redevelopment plan, either of approval, rejection or modification, and in the latter event, specify the changes recommended.

Upon receipt of the planning commission’s recommendation, or at the expiration of 45 days, if no recommendation is made by the planning commission, the commission shall submit to the governing body the redevelopment plan with the recommendation, if any, of the planning commission thereon. Prior to recommending a redevelopment plan to the governing body for approval, the commission shall consider whether the proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment project area are designed with the general purpose of accomplishing, in conformance with the general plan, a coordinated, adjusted and harmonious development of the community and its environs, which will in accordance with present and future needs promote health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity and the general welfare, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, including, among other things, adequate provision for traffic, vehicular parking, the promotion of safety from fire, panic and other dangers, adequate provision for light and air, the promotion of the healthful and convenient distribution of population, the provision of adequate transportation, water, sewerage and other public utilities, schools, parks, recreational and community facilities and other public requirements, the promotion of sound design and arrangements, the wise and efficient expenditure of public funds, the prevention of the recurrence of insanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations, slums, or conditions or blight.

The governing body, upon receipt of the redevelopment plan and the recommendation (if any) of the planning commission, shall hold a public hearing upon said plan. Notice of such hearing shall be given once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the municipality, or, if there be no newspaper published in the municipality, by posting such notice at four public places in the municipality, said notice to be published the first time or posted not less than 15 days prior to the date fixed for said hearing. The notice shall describe the redevelopment area by boundaries, in a manner designed to be understandable by the general public. The redevelopment plan, including such maps, plans, contracts, or other documents as form a part of it, together with the recommendation (if any) of the planning commission and supporting data, shall be available for public inspection at a location specified in the notice for at least 10 days prior to the hearing.At the hearing the governing body shall afford an opportunity to all persons or agencies interested to be heard and shall receive, make known, and consider recommendations in writing with reference to the redevelopment plan.

The governing body shall approve, amend, or reject the redevelopment plan as submitted.

Subject to the proviso in subsection (c) of this section, upon approval by the governing body of the redevelopment plan, the commission is authorized to acquire property, to execute contracts for clearance and preparation of the land for resale, and to take other actions necessary to carry out the plan, in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

A redevelopment plan may be modified at any time by the commission; provided that, if modified after the sale of real property in the redevelopment project area, the modification must be consented to by the redeveloper of such real property or his successor, or their successors in interest affected by the proposed modification. Where the proposed modification will substantially change the redevelopment plan as previously approved by the governing body the modification must similarly be approved by the governing body as provided above.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 10; 1961, c. 837, s. 8; 1965, c. 808; 1969, c. 254, s. 2; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-514.
Required procedures for contracts, purchases and sales; powers of commission in carrying out redevelopment project.

A commission may privately contract for engineering, legal, surveying, professional or other similar services without advertisement or bid.

In entering and carrying out any contract for construction, demolition, moving of structures, or repair work or the purchase of apparatus, supplies, materials, or equipment, a commission shall comply with the provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. In construing such provisions, the commission shall be considered to be the governing board of a “subdivision of the State,” and a contract for demolition or moving of structures, shall be treated in the same manner as a contract for construction or repair. Compliance with such provisions shall not be required, however, where the commission enters into contracts with the municipality which created it for the municipality to furnish any such services, work, apparatus, supplies, materials, or equipment; the making of these contracts without advertisement or bids is hereby specifically authorized. Advertisement or bids shall not be required for any contract for construction, demolition, moving of structures, or repair work, or for the purchase of apparatus, supplies, materials, or equipment, where such contract involves the expenditure of public money in an amount less than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

A commission may sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer the fee or any lesser interest in real property in a redevelopment project area to any redeveloper for any public or private use that accords with the redevelopment plan, subject to such covenants, conditions and restrictions as the commission may deem to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this Article. In the sale, exchange, or transfer of property, the commission shall exercise the authority and procedure set out in

G.S. 160A-268

, 160A-269, 160A-270, 160A-271, or 160A-279 for the disposition of property by a city council. Provided, however, that all sales, exchanges, or other transfers of real property from July 9, 1985, to December 31, 1987, in accordance with the provisions of this section prior to its revision on July 9, 1985, shall be and are valid in all respects.

A commission may sell personal property having a value of less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) at private sale without advertisement and bids.

In carrying out a redevelopment project, the commission may:

With or without consideration and at private sale convey to the municipality in which the project is located such real property as, in accordance with the redevelopment plan, is to be laid out into streets, alleys, and public ways.

With or without consideration, convey at private sale, grant, or dedicate easements and rights-of-way for public utilities, sewers, streets and other similar facilities, in accordance with the redevelopment plan.

With or without consideration and at private sale convey to the municipality, county or other appropriate public body such real property as, in accordance with the redevelopment plan, is to be used for parks, schools, public buildings, facilities or other public purposes.

In addition to other authority contained in this section, after a public hearing advertised in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 160A-513(e)

, and subject to the approval of the governing body of the municipality, convey to a nonprofit association or corporation organized and operated exclusively for educational, scientific, literary, cultural, charitable or religious purposes, no part of the net earnings of which inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, such real property as, in accordance with the redevelopment plan, is to be used for the purposes of such associations or corporations. Such conveyance shall be for such consideration as may be agreed upon by the commission and the association or corporation, which shall not be less than the fair value of the property agreed upon by a committee of three professional real estate appraisers currently practicing in the State, which committee shall be appointed by the commission. All conveyances made under the authority of this subsection shall contain restrictive covenants limiting the use of property so conveyed to the purposes for which the conveyance is made.

After receiving the required approval of a sale from the governing body of the municipality, the commission may execute any required contracts, deeds, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate any such contract or sale. Any contract of sale between a commission and a redeveloper may contain, without being limited to, any or all of the following provisions:

Plans prepared by the redeveloper or otherwise and such other documents as may be required to show the type, material, structure and general character of the proposed redevelopment;

A statement of the use intended for each part of the proposed redevelopment;

A guaranty of completion of the proposed redevelopment within specified time limits;

The amount, if known, of the consideration to be paid;

Adequate safeguards for proper maintenance of all parts of the proposed redevelopment;

Such other continuing controls as may be deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Article.Any deed to a redeveloper in furtherance of a redevelopment contract shall be executed in the name of the commission, by its proper officers, and shall contain in addition to all other provisions, such conditions, restrictions and provisions as the commission may deem desirable to run with the land in order to effectuate the purposes of this Article.

The commission may temporarily rent or lease, operate and maintain real property in a redevelopment project area, pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment, for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the redevelopment plan.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 11; 1961, c. 837, s. 9; 1963, c. 1212, ss. 1, 2; 1965, c. 679, s. 2; 1967, c. 24, s. 18; c. 932, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1985, c. 665, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 364; 1989, c. 413; 2003-66, ss. 1, 2.

Local Modification.

Craven and Duplin: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; Durham: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; Edgecombe: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; Lee: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; Lenoir: 1983, c. 207; Macon and Madison: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; Mecklenburg: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; New Hanover: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; Robeson and Sampson: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; Swain: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; Wayne: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; Yancey: 1963, c. 1212, s. 4; 1965, cc. 539, 818; city of Asheboro: 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 308; cities of Charlotte and
Durham: 1965, c. 1206; 1967, c. 815; city of Fayetteville: 1983, c. 235; city of Goldsboro: 1973, c. 346; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 947; 1985, c. 281; city of Kinston: 1981, c. 868; 1983, c. 207; city of New Bern: 1965, c. 1206; 1967, c. 815; 1971, c. 1060; 1973, c. 1104; city of Raleigh: 1973, c. 346; 1977, c. 76; city of Williamston: 1971, c. 1060; 1975, c. 470; city of Wilmington: 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1321; 1981, c. 582; town of Chapel Hill: 1973, c. 346; 1975, c. 379; 1977, c. 76; town of Princeville: 1983, c. 265; town of Tarboro: 1973, c. 346; 1975, c. 379.

Session Laws 1977, c. 76, amended Session Laws 1973, c. 346, without making any reference to Session Laws 1975, c. 379, which made the 1973 act applicable to the town of Tarboro.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

§ 160A-515.
Eminent domain.

The commission may exercise the right of eminent domain in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 40A, but only where the property to be taken is a blighted parcel.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 12; 1965, c. 679, s. 3; c. 1132; 1967, c. 932, ss. 2, 3; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1981, c. 919, s. 30; 2006-224, s. 2.4; 2006-259, s. 47.

§ 160A-515.1.
Project development financing.

Authorization. — A city may finance a redevelopment project and any related public improvements with the proceeds of project development financing debt instruments, issued pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, together with any other revenues that are available to the city. Before it receives the approval of the Local Government Commission for issuance of project development financing debt instruments, the city’s governing body must define a development financing district and adopt a development financing plan for the district. The city may act jointly with a county to finance a project, define a development financing district, and adopt a development financing plan for the district.

Development Financing District. — A development financing district shall comprise all or portions of one or more redevelopment areas defined pursuant to this Article. The total land area within development financing districts in a city, including development financing districts created pursuant to

G.S. 158-7.3

, may not exceed five percent (5%) of the total land area of the city. For purposes of this section, land in a district created by a county that subsequently becomes part of a city does not count against the city’s five-percent (5%) limit unless the city and the county have entered into an agreement pursuant to G.S. 159-107(e).

Development Financing Plan. — The development financing plan must be compatible with the redevelopment plan or plans for the redevelopment area or areas included within the district. The development financing plan must include all of the following:

A description of the boundaries of the development financing district.

A description of the proposed development of the district, both public and private.

The costs of the proposed public activities.

The sources and amounts of funds to pay for the proposed public activities.

The base valuation of the development financing district.

The projected incremental valuation of the development financing district.

The estimated duration of the development financing district.

A description of how the proposed development of the district, both public and private, will benefit the residents and business owners of the district in terms of jobs, affordable housing, or services.

A description of the appropriate ameliorative activities which will be undertaken if the proposed projects have a negative impact on residents or business owners of the district in terms of jobs, affordable housing, services, or displacement.

A requirement that the initial users of any new manufacturing facilities that will be located in the district and that are included in the plan will comply with the wage requirements in subsection (d) of this section.

Wage Requirements. — A development financing plan shall include a requirement that the initial users of a new manufacturing facility to be located in the district and included in the plan must pay its employees an average weekly manufacturing wage that is either above the average manufacturing wage paid in the county in which the district will be located or not less than ten percent (10%) above the average weekly manufacturing wage paid in the State. The plan may include information on the wages to be paid by the initial users of a new manufacturing facility to its employees and any provisions necessary to implement the wage requirement. The issuing unit’s governing body shall not adopt a plan until the Secretary of Commerce certifies that the Secretary has reviewed the average weekly manufacturing wage required by the plan to be paid to the employees of a new manufacturing facility and has found either (i) that the wages proposed by the initial users of a new manufacturing facility are in compliance with the amount required by this subsection or (ii) that the plan is exempt from the requirement of this subsection. The Secretary of Commerce may exempt a plan from the requirement of this subsection if the Secretary receives a resolution from the issuing unit’s governing body requesting an exemption from the wage requirement and a letter from an appropriate State official, selected by the Secretary, finding that unemployment in the county in which the proposed district is to be located is especially severe. Upon the creation of the district, the unit of local government proposing the creation of the district shall take any lawful actions necessary to require compliance with the applicable wage requirement by the initial users of any new manufacturing facility included in the plan; however, failure to take such actions or obtain such compliance shall not affect the validity of any proceedings for the creation of the district, the existence of the district, or the validity of any debt instruments issued under Article 6 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes. All findings and determinations made by the Secretary of Commerce under this subsection shall be binding and conclusive. For purposes of this section, the term “manufacturing facility” means any facility that is used in the manufacturing or production of tangible personal property, including the processing resulting in a change in the condition of the property.

County Review. — Before adopting a plan for a development financing district, the city council shall send notice of the plan, by first-class mail, to the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the development financing district is located. The person mailing the notice shall certify that fact, and the date thereof, to the city council, and the certificate is conclusive in the absence of fraud. Unless the board of county commissioners (or either board, if the district is in two counties) by resolution disapproves the proposed plan within 28 days after the date the notice is mailed, the city council may proceed to adopt the plan.

Environmental Review. — Before adopting a plan for development financing districts, the city council shall submit the plan to the Secretary of Environmental Quality to review to determine if the construction and operation of any new manufacturing facility in the district will have a materially adverse effect on the environment and whether the company that will operate the facility has operated in substantial compliance with federal and State laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment. If the Secretary finds that the new manufacturing facility will not have a materially adverse effect on the environment and that the company that will operate the facility has operated other facilities in compliance with environmental requirements, the Secretary shall approve the plan. In making the determination on environmental impact, the Secretary shall use the same criteria that apply to the determination under

G.S. 159C-7

of whether an industrial project will have a materially adverse effect on the environment. The findings of the Secretary are conclusive and binding.

Plan Adoption. — Before adopting a plan for a development financing district, the city council shall hold a public hearing on the plan. The council shall, no less than 30 days before the day of hearing, cause notice of the hearing to be mailed by first-class mail to all property owners and mailing addresses within the proposed development financing district. The council shall also, no more than 30 days and no less than 14 days before the day of the hearing, cause notice of the hearing to be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the city. The notice shall state the time and place of the hearing, shall specify its purpose, and shall state that a copy of the proposed plan is available for public inspection in the office of the city clerk. At the public hearing, the council shall hear anyone who wishes to speak with respect to the proposed district and proposed plan. Unless a board of county commissioners or the Secretary of Environmental Quality has disapproved the plan pursuant to subsection (e) or (f) of this section, the council may adopt the plan, with or without amendment, at any time after the public hearing. However, the plan and the district do not become effective until the city’s application to issue project development financing debt instruments has been approved by the Local Government Commission, pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

Plan Modification. — Subject to the limitations of this subsection, a city council may, after the effective date of the district, amend a development financing plan adopted for a development financing district. Before making any amendment, the city council shall follow the procedures and meet the requirements of subsections (d) through (g) of this section. The boundaries of the district may be enlarged only during the first five years after the effective date of the district and only if the area to be added has been or is about to be developed and the development is primarily attributable to development that has occurred within the district, as certified by the Local Government Commission. The boundaries of the district may be reduced at any time, but the city may agree with the holders of any project development financing debt instruments to restrict its power to reduce district boundaries.

Plan Implementation. — In implementing a development financing plan, a city may act directly, through a redevelopment commission, through one or more contracts with private agencies, or by any combination of these. A private agency that enters into a contract with a city for the implementation of a development financing plan is subject to the provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes only to the extent specified in the contract.

History.

2003-403, s. 18; 2005-238, s. 12; 2006-211, s. 4; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).